Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 28.1 Unfair Home Improvement Loans to Senior Citizens

6-28.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Unfair Home Improvement Loans for Senior Citizens Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 121, § 1.

6-28.1-2.
Definitions.

“Consumer” means an individual who seeks or acquires, by purchase or lease, any goods or services for personal, family, or household purposes.

“Disabled person” means any person who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities.

“Goods” means tangible chattels bought or leased for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, including certificates or coupons exchangeable for these goods, and including goods that, at the time of the sale or subsequently, are to be so affixed to real property as to become a part of real property whether or not severable from real property.

“Home solicitation” means any transaction made at the consumer’s primary residence, except those transactions initiated by the consumer. A consumer response to an advertisement is not a home solicitation.

“Person” means an individual, partnerships, corporation, limited-liability company, association, or other group, however organized.

“Senior citizen” means a person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older.

“Services” means work, labor, and services for other than a commercial or business and including services furnished in connection with the sale or repair of goods.

“Transaction” means an agreement between a consumer and any other person, whether or not the agreement is a contract enforceable by action, and includes the making of, and the performance pursuant to, that agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 20.

6-28.1-3.
Home solicitation.

The following unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices undertaken by any person in a transaction intended to result or which results in the sale or lease of goods or services to any consumer are unlawful:

The home solicitation of a consumer who is a senior citizen where a loan is made encumbering the primary residence of that consumer for the purposes of paying for home improvements and where the transaction is part of a pattern or practice in violation of either subsection (h) or (i) of 15 U.S.C. § 1639 or subsection (e) of 12 CFR 226.32.

A third party shall not be liable under this section unless: (1) There was an agency relationship between the party who engaged in home solicitation and the third party; or (2) The third party had actual knowledge of or participated in the unfair or deceptive transaction. A third party who is a holder in due course under a home solicitation transaction shall not be liable under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 20.

6-28.1-4.
Penalty for violation.

Anyone who violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person, firm, or corporation, who or that has been found guilty, as previously stated, or any person, firm, or corporation acquiring derivative rights from someone found guilty shall be prohibited from maintaining any civil action for the recovery of any debt created as a result of the violation and shall issue a discharge of any encumbrance recorded on the real property securing the debt.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 20.